Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6675YH (5) 91 da/js H.F. 2444 DIVISION I 1 FARM-TO-TABLE EVENT 2 Section 1. Section 137F.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 3 the following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. âFarm-to-table eventâ means an event 5 where food is stored, prepared, and served on a farm as defined 6 in section 673A.3, if all of the following apply: 7 a. The person operating the event holds a legal interest in 8 the farm. 9 b. The principal source of income annually generated from 10 the farm does not, during the previous licensing period if 11 applicable, derive from the operation of all events conducted 12 on the farm during that period. 13 c. Any meal served by the person or on behalf of the person 14 at the event complies with all of the following: 15 (1) Is prepared on the farm for on-premises consumption. 16 (2) Is served outside a building, unless otherwise provided 17 by rules adopted by the department pursuant to section 137F.22. 18 (3) Includes a food entree that has as a principal 19 ingredient, but not necessarily the main ingredient, a farm 20 commodity as defined in section 673A.3 that was produced on the 21 farm. 22 Sec. 2. Section 137F.1, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended 23 by adding the following new paragraph: 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . p. A farm-to-table event. 25 Sec. 3. Section 137F.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 26 by adding the following new paragraph: 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . l. For a farm-to-table event as provided in 28 section 137F.22, regardless of the number of events conducted 29 on the farm for the period of the license, one hundred dollars. 30 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 137F.22 Farm-to-table event. 31 1. A person shall not operate a farm-to-table event until 32 the person is issued an annual license under this section. The 33 license shall cover all farm-to-table events conducted on the 34 farm. 35 -1- LSB 6675YH (5) 91 da/js 1/ 9 H.F. 2444 2. The department shall regulate, license, and inspect 1 a farm-to-table event. The department may enter into an 2 agreement with a municipal corporation to act as a regulatory 3 authority in the same manner as provided in sections 137F.3 and 4 137F.3A. 5 3. a. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 6 17A to administer and enforce the provisions of this section. 7 b. The rules described in paragraph âaâ may provide for all 8 of the following: 9 (1) Food safety, including equipment, practices, and 10 parameters. 11 (2) Sanitary conditions, including facilities, practices, 12 and parameters. 13 (3) Fire control, including devices, practices, and 14 parameters. 15 c. The rules described in paragraph âaâ may provide 16 for meals being served inside a building if unforeseen 17 circumstances would otherwise prevent the event from occurring. 18 4. A person who violates this section is subject to the same 19 penalty as provided in section 137F.9. 20 DIVISION II 21 COTTAGE FOOD 22 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 137F.21 Cottage food ââ sale at a food 23 establishment ââ requirements. 24 1. Cottage food is exempt from all licensing, permitting, 25 inspection, packaging, and labeling laws of the state if 26 the food is sold and delivered by the producer to a food 27 establishment and the food is intended for preparation or 28 consumption off premises. 29 2. The food establishment shall not intermingle 30 cottage food with food that is not cottage food. The food 31 establishment shall not store cottage food and other food on 32 the same shelf or as part of the same display. 33 3. The food establishment shall not sell cottage food unless 34 all of the following apply: 35 -2- LSB 6675YH (5) 91 da/js 2/ 9 H.F. 2444 a. Packaged cottage food must be affixed or labeled with the 1 information required under section 137F.20. 2 b. The food establishment must post a conspicuous notice 3 at the location where the cottage food is offered for sale or 4 sold. The notice shall state the following: 5 âCOTTAGE FOOD 6 This product was produced at a residential property that is 7 exempt from state licensing and inspection. See the available 8 information provided on the packaged label or a fact sheet made 9 available at this store.â 10 c. The food establishment shall make available in a 11 prominent place at the location where the cottage food is 12 offered for sale or sold a fact sheet that includes the 13 information described in paragraph âaâ . 14 4. Compliance with the cottage food exemption provided in 15 this section does not represent compliance with federal law. 16 DIVISION III 17 DISTRIBUTION OF RAW MILK AND ASSOCIATED PRODUCTS 18 Sec. 6. Section 137D.2A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 137D.2A Raw milk ââ associated products. 21 1. A home food processing establishment shall not 22 market, advertise for sale, offer for sale, sell or otherwise 23 distribute, or use raw milk, or a manufactured raw milk product 24 or raw milk dairy product, as provided in chapter 195 . 25 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a home food processing 26 establishment may market, advertise for sale, offer for sale, 27 or sell or otherwise distribute raw milk, or a manufactured 28 raw milk product or a raw milk dairy product, if all of the 29 following apply: 30 a. The home food processing establishment is operating under 31 a license issued pursuant to section 137D.2. 32 b. The home food processing establishment is located on 33 the premises of a raw milk dairy farm where the raw milk is 34 produced and processed, or the raw milk product or raw milk 35 -3- LSB 6675YH (5) 91 da/js 3/ 9 H.F. 2444 dairy product is manufactured, as provided in chapter 195. 1 c. The raw milk producer operating the raw milk dairy farm 2 acts in compliance with the requirements in chapter 195. 3 d. The raw milk, or the raw milk product or raw milk dairy 4 product, meets the requirements of chapter 195, including 5 requirements for distribution as provided in section 195.8. 6 Sec. 7. Section 137F.8B, Code 2026, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 137F.8B Raw milk ââ associated products. 9 1. A food establishment or farmers market shall not 10 advertise for sale, offer for sale, sell or otherwise 11 distribute, or use raw milk, or a manufactured raw milk product 12 or a raw milk dairy product, regardless of whether the food 13 establishment or farmers market is regulated by the department 14 under this chapter or another chapter, another state agency, 15 or a municipality. 16 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a food establishment 17 that sells or otherwise distributes food for off-premises 18 consumption may market, advertise for sale, offer for sale, 19 or sell or otherwise distribute raw milk, or a manufactured 20 raw milk product or a raw milk dairy product, if all of the 21 following apply: 22 a. The food establishment is operating under a license 23 issued pursuant to section 137F.4. 24 b. The food establishment is located on the premises of 25 a raw milk dairy farm where the raw milk is produced and 26 processed, or the raw milk product or raw milk dairy product is 27 manufactured, as provided in chapter 195. 28 c. The raw milk producer operating the raw milk dairy farm 29 acts in compliance with the requirements in chapter 195. 30 d. The raw milk, or the raw milk product or raw milk dairy 31 product, meets the requirements of chapter 195, including 32 requirements for distribution as provided in section 195.8. 33 Sec. 8. Section 195.8, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2026, 34 is amended to read as follows: 35 -4- LSB 6675YH (5) 91 da/js 4/ 9 H.F. 2444 c. (1) The raw milk producer shall distribute the raw 1 milk directly to the individual at the raw milk dairy or to a 2 location specified by the individual. However, 3 (2) (a) Except as provided in subparagraph division (b), 4 a person shall not deliver the raw milk to a place of business 5 where food or food items are distributed on a retail basis, 6 including but not limited to a farmers market regulated under 7 chapter 137F. 8 (b) A person may deliver the raw milk to a licensed home 9 food processing establishment regulated under chapter 137D as 10 provided in section 137D.2A or to a licensed food establishment 11 or farmers market regulated under chapter 137F as provided in 12 section 137F.8B . 13 (3) The raw milk shall only be used for consumption by the 14 individual, members of the individualâs household, and the 15 individualâs nonpaying guests or nonpaying employees. 16 Sec. 9. Section 195.8, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 2026, 17 is amended to read as follows: 18 c. (1) The raw milk producer shall distribute the raw milk 19 product or raw milk dairy product directly to the individual 20 at the raw milk dairy or to a location specified by the 21 individual. However, 22 (2) (a) Except as provided in subparagraph division (b), a 23 person shall not deliver the raw milk product or raw milk dairy 24 product to a place of business where food or a food item is 25 distributed on a retail basis, including but not limited to a 26 farmers market regulated under chapter 137F. 27 (b) A person may deliver the raw milk product or a raw milk 28 dairy product to a licensed home food processing establishment 29 regulated under chapter 137D as provided in section 137D.2A or 30 to a licensed food establishment or farmers market regulated 31 under chapter 137F as provided in section 137F.8B . 32 (3) The raw milk product or raw milk dairy product shall 33 only be used for consumption by the individual, members of the 34 individualâs household, or the individualâs nonpaying guests 35 -5- LSB 6675YH (5) 91 da/js 5/ 9 H.F. 2444 or nonpaying employees. 1 DIVISION IV 2 RULEMAKING AND EFFECTIVE DATE 3 Sec. 10. EMERGENCY RULES. The department of inspections, 4 appeals, and licensing shall adopt emergency rules under 5 section 17A.4, subsection 3, and section 17A.5, subsection 2, 6 paragraph âbâ, to implement the provisions of this Act within 7 one hundred eighty days of the effective date of this Act and 8 shall submit such rules to the administrative rules coordinator 9 and the administrative code editor pursuant to section 17A.5, 10 subsection 1, within the same period. The rules shall be 11 effective immediately upon filing unless a later date is 12 specified in the rules. Any rules adopted in accordance with 13 this section shall also be published as a notice of intended 14 action as provided in section 17A.4. 15 Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of 16 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 17